Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

§142-91 Destruction of animals ferae
naturae. (a) No person shall shoot or otherwise destroy any animal ferae
naturae or its progeny within ten years of the introduction of the species into
the State.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed
to prohibit the destruction of such animals as shall be proved to be common
nuisances. [PC 1869, c 85, pt of §8; am L 1870, c 13, §2; RL 1925, §668; RL
1935, §253; RL 1945, §1095; RL 1955, §20-90; HRS §142-91; am L 1986, c 268, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next